Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.370

Negotiated rule making.

The secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's duty to engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW 34.05.310(2)(a) with the exclusive representative of the family child care licensees selected in accordance with RCW 43.216.375 and with other affected interests before adopting requirements that affect family child care licensees.

[ 2018 c 58 s 35; 2007 c 17 s 15. Formerly RCW 43.215.350.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.